Utah statutes.
16-10a-303.   Ultra vires.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the validity of corporate action
may not be challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked power
to act.
(2)  A corporation's power to act may be challenged:
(a)  in a proceeding by a shareholder against the corporation to enjoin the
act;
(b)  in a proceeding by the corporation, directly, derivatively, or through a
receiver, trustee, or other legal representative, against an incumbent or
former director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation; or
(c)  in a proceeding by the attorney general under Section 16-10a-1430.
(3)  In a shareholder's proceeding under Subsection (2) (a) to enjoin an
unauthorized corporate act, the court may enjoin or set aside the act, if
equitable and if all affected persons are parties to the proceeding, and may
award damages for loss, other than anticipated profits, suffered by the
corporation or another party because of enjoining the unauthorized act.
